Utah statutes.
75-3-309.   Informal appointment proceedings -- Registrar not satisfied.

If the registrar is not satisfied that a requested informal appointment of a personal representative should be made because of failure to meet the requirements of Sections 75-3-307 and 75-3-308, or for any other reason, he may decline the application. A declination of informal appointment is not an adjudication and does not preclude appointment in formal proceedings.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

